Virginia statutes. Title 42.1. Libraries.
Chapter 3. State and Federal Aid.

§ 42.1-46.
Library policy of the Commonwealth.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the Commonwealth, as a part of its provision of essential service to communities and for public education, to promote the establishment and development of public library service throughout its various political subdivisions.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-23; 1970, c. 606; 2020, c. 54.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 54 inserted “of essential service to communities and.”

§ 42.1-47.
Grants for development of library service.

In order to provide state aid in the development of public library service throughout the Commonwealth, the Library Board, in this chapter sometimes called the Board, shall grant from such appropriations as are made for this purpose funds to provide library service.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-24; 1952, c. 494; 1970, c. 606.

§ 42.1-48.
Grants to improve standards.

In order to encourage the maintenance and development of proper standards, including personnel standards, and the combination of libraries or library systems into larger and more economical units of service, grants of state aid from funds available shall be made by the Board to any free public library or library system which qualifies under the standards set by the Board. The grants to each qualifying library or system in each fiscal year shall be as follows:

Forty cents of state aid for every dollar expended, or to be expended, exclusive of state and federal aid, by the political subdivision or subdivisions operating or participating in the library or system. The grant to any county or city shall not exceed $250,000;

A per capita grant based on the population of the area served and the number of participating counties or cities: Thirty cents per capita for the first 600,000 persons to a library or system serving one city or county, and an additional ten cents per capita for the first 600,000 persons for each additional city or county served. Libraries or systems serving a population in excess of 600,000 shall receive ten cents per capita for the excess; and

A grant of ten dollars per square mile of area served to every library or library system, and an additional grant of twenty dollars per square mile of area served to every library system serving more than one city or county.

The Board may establish procedures for the review and timely adjustment of such grants when the political subdivision or subdivisions operating such library or library system are affected by annexation.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-26; 1952, c. 494; 1958, c. 513; 1960, c. 234; 1970, c. 606; 1978, c. 565; 1989, c. 85; 1990, c. 48.

§ 42.1-49.
Grants to municipal libraries.

Every qualifying municipal library serving an area containing less than 5,000 population shall receive its proper share, but not less than $400.

History.

1970, c. 606.

§ 42.1-50.
Limitation of grants; proration of funds.

The total amount of grants under §§

42.1-48

and

42.1-49

shall not exceed the amount expended, exclusive of state and federal aid, by the political subdivision or subdivisions operating the library. If the state appropriations provided for grants under §§

42.1-48

and

42.1-49

are not sufficient to meet approved applications, the Library Board shall prorate the available funds in such manner that each application shall receive its proportionate share of each type of grant. Applications must be received prior to June one of each calendar year.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-25; 1952, c. 494; 1958, c. 426; 1970, c. 606.

§ 42.1-51.
Obligations of libraries and systems receiving aid.

The obligations of the various library systems and libraries receiving state aid, shall consist of establishing and maintaining an organization as approved by the Board, provided that personnel standards of such library systems and libraries shall conform to the provisions of §

42.1-15.1

. All books and bookmobiles purchased with state aid funds shall, if the Board so determines, become the property of The Library of Virginia in the case of any library system or library which does not meet its obligations as determined by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-27; 1952, c. 494; 1970, c. 606; 1988, c. 716; 1994, c. 64.

§ 42.1-52.
Standards of eligibility for aid; reports on operation of libraries; supervision of services.

The Board shall establish standards under which library systems and libraries shall be eligible for state aid and may require reports on the operation of all libraries receiving state aid.

As long as funds are available, grants shall be made to the various libraries, library systems or contracting libraries applying for state aid in the order in which they meet the standards established by the Board.

In the event that any library meets the standards of the State Library Board but is unable to conform to §

42.1-15.1

relating to the employment of qualified librarians, the Library Board may, under a contractual agreement with such library, provide professional supervision of its services and may grant state aid funds to it in reduced amounts under a uniform plan to be adopted by the State Library Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-28; 1960, c. 235; 1970, c. 606; 1988, c. 716.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Qualifications of librarians. —

Section

42.1-15.1

and this section require that librarians in local or regional libraries, in the position of director, and other persons holding full-time professional positions deemed by the local or regional library to require American Library Association-equivalent training, shall meet the qualification standards established by the Library Board. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

Waivers to receive state aid. —

In considering requests by library systems for waivers to receive state aid under this section, the Library Board may not charge a fee or require a proffer for waiver applications. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

Authority of Library Board pertaining to access to illegal materials. —

The Library Board may require, as a condition for funding access to on-line databases, that local and regional libraries adopt policies to protect patrons, particularly minors, from Internet obscenity, child pornography, and other illegal materials; such requirement may include a mandate that recipients of such aid use filtering software or other technology protection measures to avert patron access to illegal materials. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-073, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (9/22/04).

The Library Board is without authority to dictate to local or regional libraries measures to prevent on-line access to illegal materials; however, the General Assembly may impose upon such libraries constitutional requirements limiting computer Internet access to obscenity, child pornography and other illegal materials. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-073, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (9/22/04).

§ 42.1-53.
Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 24.

§ 42.1-54.
Procedure for purchase of books, materials and equipment and payment on salaries.

All proposals for books, materials and equipment to be purchased with state aid funds and all proposals for aid in the payment of salaries of certified librarians shall be submitted for approval to The Library of Virginia by the libraries, library systems or contracting libraries applying for state aid, in form prescribed by the Board, and those approved may be ordered by the libraries, library systems or contracting libraries. Payments and disbursements from the funds appropriated for this purpose shall be made by the State Treasurer upon the approval of the duly authorized representative of the Board, to the libraries, library systems or contracting libraries within thirty days of the beginning of each quarter.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-30; 1952, c. 494; 1956, c. 168; 1970, c. 606; 1987, c. 458; 1994, c. 64.

§ 42.1-55.
Free service available to all.

The service of books in library systems and libraries receiving state aid shall be free and shall be made available to all persons living in the county, region, or municipality.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-31; 1970, c. 606.

§ 42.1-56.
Meaning of term “books.”

The term
“books”
as used in this chapter may be interpreted in the discretion of the Board to mean books, magazines, newspapers, appropriate audiovisual materials and other printed matter.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-32; 1952, c. 494; 1970, c. 606.

§ 42.1-57.
Authority of Library Board to accept and distribute federal funds.

The Library Board is empowered, subject to approval of the Governor, to accept grants of federal funds for libraries and to allocate such funds to libraries under any plan approved by the Board and the appropriate federal authorities. Such allocations shall not be subject to the restrictions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-32.1; 1964, c. 325; 1970, c. 606; 1972, c. 167.

§ 42.1-58.
Agreements providing for expenditure of federal and matching funds.

The Library Board and the cities and counties of the Commonwealth are authorized to enter into agreements providing for the supervision of the expenditure of federal funds allocated to such cities and counties and matching funds provided by such political subdivisions. Such agreement shall set forth the standards and conditions with respect to the expenditure of such funds.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-32.2; 1964, c. 324; 1970, c. 606.

§ 42.1-59.
Reserved.